test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-peegal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pēgal: # Noun 234 'eng /est pöial/fin' - full paradigm
     pēgal+N+Sg+Nom: pēgal
     pēgal+N+Sg+Gen: pēgal
     pēgal+N+Sg+Par: pēgalt
     pēgal+N+Sg+Dat: pēgalõn
     pēgal+N+Sg+Ins: pēgalõks
     pēgal+N+Sg+Ill: pēgalõ
     pēgal+N+Sg+Ela: pēgalõst
     pēgal+N+Pl+Nom: pēgald
     pēgal+N+Pl+Gen: pēgald
     pēgal+N+Pl+Par: pēgaļi
     pēgal+N+Pl+Dat: pēgaldõn
     pēgal+N+Pl+Ins: pēgaldõks
     pēgal+N+Pl+Ill: pēgaļiž
     pēgal+N+Pl+Ela: pēgaļist
